Maryland, session 2025, HB1060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
2–109.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
– 3 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) The Secretary shall adopt regulations for the office of the Secretary.
[(b)] (C) (1) The Secretary shall review regulations proposed by a unit in the
Department.
(2) The Secretary may approve, disapprove, or revise regulations proposed
by a unit in the Department.
[(c)] (D) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
Secretary shall adopt regulations to govern the policies and management of correctional
facilities in the Department in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government
Article.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to a guideline pertaining
to the routine internal management of correctional facilities in the Division of Correction.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Secretary
shall adopt regulations that provide for a requirement that:
1. a correctional officer hired on or after October 1, 2007, for
employment in any unit of the Division of Correction shall be at least 21 years old; and
2. a correctional officer hired on or after October 1, 2008, for
employment in any unit of the Division of Pretrial Detention and Services or the Patuxent
Institution shall be at least 21 years old.
(ii) The regulations adopted under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall exempt any [honorably discharged] veteran or HONORABLY
DISCHARGED reserve COMPONENT member of the [United States armed forces]
UNIFORMED SERVICES from the minimum age requirement.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–804.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the court
has jurisdiction under this subtitle only if the alleged CINA or child in a voluntary
placement is under the age of 18 years when the petition is filed.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(2) The court has jurisdiction under this subtitle over a former CINA:
(i) Whose commitment to the local department was rescinded after
the individual reached the age of 18 years but before the individual reached the age of 20
years and 6 months; and
(ii) Who did not exit foster care due to reunification, adoption,
guardianship, marriage, or [military duty] SERVICE IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES
UNIFORMED SERVICES DUTY.
[(b)] (C) If the court obtains jurisdiction over a child, that jurisdiction continues
in that case until the child reaches the age of 21 years, unless the court terminates the case.
[(c)] (D) After the court terminates jurisdiction, a custody order issued by the
court in a CINA case:
(1) Remains in effect; and
(2) May be revised or superseded only by another court of competent
jurisdiction.
[(d)] (E) Notwithstanding subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, if the court enters
an order directing the provision of services to a child under § 3–819(c)(3) or §
3–823(h)(2)(vii) of this subtitle, the court retains jurisdiction to rule on any motion related
to the enforcement, modification, or termination of the order, for as long as the order is
effective.
5–642.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) A licensed funeral establishment or holder of a permit to engage in the
business of a crematory who acts in good faith is not civilly liable for transferring the
unclaimed cremated remains of a veteran or an eligible dependent of a veteran to a veterans
service organization for purposes of disposition as provided in § 5–803 of the Business
Regulation Article and § 7–406 of the Health Occupations Article.
[(b)] (C) A veterans service organization that acts in good faith is not civilly
liable for receiving the unclaimed cremated remains of a veteran or an eligible dependent
of a veteran for purposes of disposition as provided in § 5–803 of the Business Regulation
Article and § 7–406 of the Health Occupations Article.
7–406.
– 5 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section, [“armed forces” means the armed forces of the United
States] “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(b) A clerk of court shall provide without charge:
(1) A copy of any paper or record in the clerk’s office that is requested by a
former or active [armed forces] SERVICE member OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES, in
person, or by the United States government, if the copy is to be used in connection with a
claim of the FORMER OR ACTIVE SERVICE member against the United States
government;
(2) A copy of a marriage record of a former or active [armed forces]
SERVICE member OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES that is requested by the FORMER OR
ACTIVE SERVICE member; and
(3) A copy of a marriage record of a former or active [armed forces]
SERVICE member OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES or of a surviving spouse or child of the
FORMER OR ACTIVE SERVICE member that is requested, if the copy is to be used in
connection with a claim for a dependent or beneficiary of the FORMER OR ACTIVE
SERVICE member.
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
8–302.
(a) In accordance with an agreement, if any, under § 8–213 of this title, a juror
qualification form in substantially the following form shall be provided to each prospective
juror:
Juror Qualification Form
Name:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
Resident address:
Telephone: (home) _________ (work) _________ (cellular) _______
Age: _____ Date of Birth:__________
If you are over 70 years of age, do you wish to be exempted from jury services?
_____Yes _____No
U.S. Citizen? _____Yes _____No
Able to comprehend, read, speak, and write English? _____Yes _____No
Highest level of education completed:
___ high school ___ college ___ graduate school ___ other
Occupation of prospective juror: __________
Name of employer: ___________
Occupation of spouse, if any: __________
Disability preventing satisfactory jury service? _____Yes _____No
Do you want an accommodation under the federal Americans with Disabilities
Act? _____Yes _____No
Pending charge for a crime punishable by imprisonment exceeding 1 year?
_____Yes _____No
Conviction of crime punishable by imprisonment exceeding 1 year and received
a sentence of imprisonment for more than 1 year and not legally pardoned?
_____Yes _____No
Date of Conviction __________
_____Elected official of the federal Legislative Branch, as defined in 2 U.S.C. §
30a.
_____Active duty member of armed forces, AS DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, exempted in accordance with 10 U.S.C. § 982.
– 7 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
_____ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE COMMISSIONED CORPS OF THE NATIONAL
OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION, EXEMPTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH 10 U.S.C. § 982, AS MADE APPLICABLE BY 33 U.S.C. § 307(A)(6).
_____Member of Maryland’s organized militia exempted in accordance with
Public Safety Article § 13–218.
Prior jury service within 3 preceding years: __________
Form completed by me _____ Another (name) _____ and, if another, why?
Under the penalties of perjury, the responses are true to the best of my knowledge
Signed:________________________________________________
Prospective Juror
Individual completing form for prospective juror:
This form must be completed, signed, and returned to the jury commissioner within 10 days
after receipt. Documentation for excusal due to disability, exemption based on armed forces
or militia service, pardons, and/or prior jury service must be attached.
(b) A juror qualification form for a county may include other questions as the
county’s jury plan requires.
9–501.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Veteran” [means a person who served on active duty in the uniformed
services of the United States, other than for training, and was discharged or released under
conditions other than dishonorable] HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Criminal Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(K) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
4–111.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(8)] (9) “Special purpose area” means:
(i) a location licensed to sell or dispense alcohol or cannabis for
on–site consumption;
(ii) a stadium;
(iii) a museum;
(iv) an amusement park;
(v) a racetrack; or
(vi) a video lottery facility, as defined in § 9–1A–01 of the State
Government Article.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(3) a SERVICE member [of the armed forces of the United States, the
National Guard, or the uniformed services] on duty or traveling to or from duty;
8–303.
(a) (1) In this section[, “government] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “GOVERNMENT identification document” means one of the following
documents issued by the United States government or any state or local government:
[(1)] (I) a passport;
[(2)] (II) an immigration visa;
[(3)] (III) an alien registration card;
[(4)] (IV) an employment authorization card;
[(5)] (V) a birth certificate;
– 9 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(6)] (VI) a Social Security card;
[(7)] (VII) a [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES identification;
[(8)] (VIII) an adoption decree;
[(9)] (IX) a marriage license;
[(10)] (X) a driver’s license; or
[(11)] (XI) a photo identification card.
(3) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Family Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(J) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(K) “SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(j)] (L) “State” means, except in Title 10, Subtitle 3 of this article:
(1) a state, commonwealth, possession, or territory of the United States; or
(2) the District of Columbia.
[(k)] (M) “Summons” includes a subpoena.
[(l)] (N) “Support” includes maintenance.
(O) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
2–405.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a license is not
effective until 6 a.m. on the second calendar day after the license is issued.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(2) For good cause shown, a judge of the circuit court for the county in
which the application is made may sign an authorization for a license to become effective
at a time before the waiting period expires, as stated in the authorization, if 1 of the parties
to be married is:
(i) a resident of this State; or
(ii) a SERVICE member [of the United States armed forces].
5–525.
(b) (3) (i) The Administration shall establish a program of out–of–home
placement for former CINAs:
1. whose commitment to a local department was rescinded
after the individuals reached the age of 18 years but before the individuals reached the age
of 20 years and 6 months; and
2. who did not exit foster care due to reunification, adoption,
guardianship, marriage, or [military duty] SERVICE IN THE UNIFORMED SERVICES
UNIFORMED SERVICES DUTY.
9–108.
(a) (1) In this section[:
(1)], “deployment” means compliance with [military] OFFICIAL orders
received by a SERVICE member [of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps,
Space Force, Coast Guard, National Guard, or any other Reserve component] to report for
combat operations or other active service for which the SERVICE member is required to
report unaccompanied by any family member or that is classified by the SERVICE member’s
branch as remote[; and].
(2) [“deployment”] “DEPLOYMENT” does not include [National Guard or
Reserve] RESERVE COMPONENT annual training, inactive duty days, or drill weekends.
Article – General Provisions
1–101.1.
“ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–101.2.
– 11 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
“ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–103.1.
“ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.1.
“RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–114.2.
“SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–116.
“UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–117.
(A) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) With respect to any State program of benefits, rights, or privileges applicable
to a veteran under this Code, “veteran” includes[, if the individual is eligible under 38
U.S.C. § 101, a member of the commissioned corps of:
(1) the Public Health Service; or
(2) the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration or its
predecessor, the Coast and Geodetic Survey] AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
DEFINITION OF “VETERAN” UNDER § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Public Safety
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(A–1) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(A–2) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(D–1) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(F) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(G) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–202.
(a–1) For purposes of this section, an individual served in the Afghanistan or Iraq
conflict if the individual was a member of the uniformed services [of the United States]
who served in:
(1) Afghanistan or contiguous air space, as defined in federal regulations,
on or after October 24, 2001, and before a terminal date to be prescribed by the United
States Secretary of Defense; or
(2) Iraq or contiguous waters or air space, as defined in federal regulations,
on or after March 19, 2003, and before a terminal date to be prescribed by the United States
Secretary of Defense.
(e) (1) The Secretary of State shall issue a State flag to the family of a
firefighter, policeman, member of the [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES, sworn member
of the office of State Fire Marshal, or professional or volunteer emergency medical services
provider who is killed in the performance of duty.
(2) (i) Except when the deceased is a member of the [military]
UNIFORMED SERVICES, the flag shall be presented to the family of the deceased by the
State Senator of the legislative district in which the deceased resided or served.
(ii) When the deceased is a member of the [military] UNIFORMED
SERVICES, the flag shall be presented to the family of the deceased by the Department of
Veterans and Military Families.
2–418.
– 13 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
subsection, a police employee who resigns from the Department for any reason may not be
reappointed.
(2) A police employee who resigns to enter [military] service IN THE
UNIFORMED SERVICES may be reappointed.
3–209.
(a) The Commission shall certify as a police officer each individual who:
(5) (ii) subject to subsection (b) of this section, is a permanent legal
resident of the United States and [an honorably discharged] A veteran [of the United States
armed forces], provided that the individual has applied to obtain United States citizenship
and the application is still pending approval.
5–102.
This subtitle does not apply to:
(4) law enforcement personnel of any unit of the federal government,
members of the armed forces [of the United States] or the National Guard, or law
enforcement personnel of the State or any local agency in the State, while those personnel
or members are acting within the scope of their official duties;
5–103.
This subtitle does not affect:
(2) a sale, rental, transfer, or the use of a regulated firearm by a person
authorized or required to do so as part of the person’s duties as a member of:
(ii) the armed forces [of the United States], including all official
reserve organizations; or
5–117.1.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(3) a member or retired member of the armed forces [of the United States]
or the National Guard; or
(c) A person may purchase, rent, or receive a handgun only if the person:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(1) (iii) is an active or retired member of the armed forces [of the United
States] or the National Guard and possesses a valid [military] UNIFORMED SERVICES
identification card; or
5–132.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) the purchase, sale, or transportation of a handgun to or by a federally
licensed gun dealer or manufacturer that provides or services a handgun for:
(ii) members of the armed forces [of the United States] or the
National Guard;
5–133.
(d) (2) Unless a person is otherwise prohibited from possessing a regulated
firearm, this subsection does not apply to:
(iii) a member of the armed forces [of the United States] or the
National Guard while performing official duties;
5–134.
(c) A person is not required to complete a certified firearms safety training course
under subsection (b)(14) of this section if the person:
(3) is a member, retired member, or honorably discharged member of the
armed forces [of the United States] or the National Guard;
5–137.
(b) If a person purchases a regulated firearm for use within the scope of the
person’s official duties, the Secretary may waive the 7–day waiting period under § 5–124 of
this subtitle for:
(2) members of the armed forces [of the United States] or the National
Guard; or
5–203.
(a) A person may not possess a short–barreled rifle or short–barreled shotgun
unless:
(1) the person, while on official business is:
– 15 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) a member of the armed forces [of the United States] or the
National Guard while on duty or traveling to or from duty;
5–204.1.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a sale, rental, or transfer:
(iii) involving law enforcement personnel of any unit of the federal
government, a member of the armed forces [of the United States], a member of the National
Guard, or law enforcement personnel of the State or any local agency in the State, while
acting in the scope of official duty;
5–306.
(a) Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the Secretary shall issue a
permit within a reasonable time to a person who the Secretary finds:
(1) (ii) is a person who is a member of [the armed forces of the United
States, the National Guard, or] the uniformed services OR THE NATIONAL GUARD;
(b) An applicant for a permit is not required to complete a certified firearms
training course under subsection (a) of this section if the applicant:
(2) is a member, retired member, or honorably discharged member of the
armed forces [of the United States] or the National Guard;
11–105.
(c) This section does not apply to the armed forces [of the United States], the
National Guard, the State Guard, or officers or employees of the United States, the State,
or a local subdivision of the State who are authorized to handle explosives in the
performance of their duties.
13–205.
Subject to the provisions of this title and the regulations governing the armed forces
[of the United States], an individual may be enlisted in the organized militia if the
individual:
(1) is a citizen of the State or has declared an intention to become a citizen
of the State;
(2) is able–bodied; and
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(3) has good character and temperate habits.
13–215.
(a) (1) The Adjutant General may organize a uniformed honor guard from the
National Guard or the organized militia to attend the burial service of a deceased veteran
if:
(i) the commander of an accredited veterans’ organization or a
relative or friend of the deceased veteran requests an honor guard to attend the burial
service;
(ii) a uniformed honor guard from the active [armed forces]
UNIFORMED SERVICES or veterans’ organization is not available; and
(iii) the Adjutant General determines that providing an honor guard
will not harm:
1. the readiness of the National Guard in the event of a State
or federal emergency; or
2. the employment of a National Guard member.
(2) If an honor guard from the active [armed forces] UNIFORMED
SERVICES is not available, the Adjutant General may request an honor guard from a
veterans’ organization to attend the burial service of a deceased veteran.
13–503.
(b) An individual may not be commissioned or enlisted in the Maryland Defense
Force if the individual:
(2) has been dismissed from or received a bad conduct discharge or a
dishonorable discharge, or any discharge other than under honorable conditions, from a
military or naval organization of this State or of another state, or from any of the [United
States armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES or its auxiliaries, or has been convicted of an
offense under the laws of the United States or of any state punishable by imprisonment for
more than 1 year, no matter what punishment was actually imposed; or
13–510.
(b) (1) Each individual commissioned or appointed as an officer or warrant
officer [shall] MUST be:
– 17 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) an officer, warrant officer, or enlisted individual of the National
Guard;
(ii) a retired or former officer or warrant officer of the [United States
Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard] UNIFORMED
SERVICES or any auxiliary thereof;
(iii) an individual with prior [enlisted] service in the [United States
Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard,] UNIFORMED
SERVICES or [any auxiliary thereof] A RESERVE COMPONENT;
(iv) a graduate of the United States Military Academy, Naval
Academy, Coast Guard Academy, Merchant Marine Academy, [or] Air Force Academy, OR
UNIFORMED SERVICES UNIVERSITY;
(v) a graduate of a school, college, university, or officers’ training
school who received [military] instruction under the supervision of an officer of the [United
States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard] UNIFORMED
SERVICES who certified the graduate’s fitness for appointment as a commissioned officer;
or
(vi) an individual not otherwise identified in items (i) through (v) of
this paragraph who is specially qualified for service by achievement in any professional,
technical, or public service capacity or otherwise displays extraordinary qualifications for
commissioning as an officer of the Maryland Defense Force.
(c) When initially appointed, a general officer or colonel of the organized militia
must:
(2) have served in [any component or auxiliary of the United States Army,
Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard or National Guard] THE
UNIFORMED SERVICES OR A RESERVE COMPONENT with the grade of O–4 or higher.
(d) When initially appointed, a lieutenant–colonel or major of the line must have
had service as an officer for at least 2 years in [any component or auxiliary of the United
States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard or National
Guard] THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR A RESERVE COMPONENT.
13–601.
(a) (2) The Governor may grant a brevet commission to an officer of the
organized militia of a grade equal to the highest grade in which the officer previously served
in the organized militia or in the [United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force,
Space Force, or Coast Guard] ARMED FORCES.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
13–704.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ELIGIBLE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL ENGAGED
IN MILITARY SERVICE.
(3) “ELIGIBLE SPOUSE” MEANS THE SPOUSE OF AN ELIGIBLE
SERVICE MEMBER.
[(2)] (4) “Military service” means:
(i) in the case of [a service member] AN INDIVIDUAL who is a
member or reserve member of the [Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or
Coast Guard] ARMED FORCES, full–time duty in the active military service [of the United
States], including:
1. full–time training duty;
2. annual training duty; and
3. attendance while at a school designated as a service school
by federal law or by the secretary of the military department concerned;
(ii) in the case of a resident of the State who is a member [or reserve
member of the Maryland National Guard, the National Guard of another state, or] OF a
reserve component of the [armed forces] UNIFORMED SERVICES, service under a call to:
1. active service authorized by the President of the United
States [or], the Secretary of Defense, OR THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES for a period of more than 30 days in response to a national emergency declared
by the President of the United States; or
2. active duty for a period of more than 30 consecutive days;
(iii) in the case of [a service member] AN INDIVIDUAL who is a
commissioned officer of the Public Health Service or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration, active service; or
(iv) any period during which [a service member] AN INDIVIDUAL is
absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause.
[(3) “Military spouse” means the spouse of a service member.
(4) “Service member” means an individual engaged in military service.]
– 19 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) This section is intended to supplement rights and protections provided in the
federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. App. 501 et seq.).
(c) (1) In addition to the rights and protections regarding consumer
transactions, contracts, and service providers included in Title III of the federal
Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. App. 531 through 538), [a] AN ELIGIBLE
service member or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse may terminate a contract described in
paragraph (2) of this subsection at any time after the date the ELIGIBLE service member
receives [military] OFFICIAL orders to relocate for a period of military service of at least
90 days to a location where the ELIGIBLE service member would be unable to use the
services under the contract.
(2) This section applies to a contract to provide any of the following:
(i) telecommunication services;
(ii) Internet services;
(iii) television services;
(iv) athletic club or gym memberships; and
(v) satellite radio services.
(3) (i) [A] AN ELIGIBLE service member or [military] ELIGIBLE
spouse may terminate a contract under this section by delivering a written or electronic
notice of the termination and a copy of the ELIGIBLE service member’s [military]
OFFICIAL orders to the service provider.
(ii) If [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member or [military] ELIGIBLE
spouse terminates a contract, the service provider shall provide the ELIGIBLE service
member or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse with a written or electronic notice of the ELIGIBLE
service member’s rights posted on the Maryland National Guard’s Internet website.
(d) (1) If [a] AN ELIGIBLE service member or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse
terminates or suspends the provision of services under this section and the ELIGIBLE
service member is no longer in [active] military service, the ELIGIBLE service member or
[military] ELIGIBLE spouse may reinstate the provision of service on the same terms and
conditions as originally agreed to with the service provider before the termination or
suspension on written notice to the provider that the ELIGIBLE service member is no longer
in [active] military service.
(2) Written notice under this subsection shall be given within 90 days after
termination of the ELIGIBLE service member’s [active] military service.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(e) [A] AN ELIGIBLE service member or [military] ELIGIBLE spouse who
terminates, suspends, or reinstates the provision of services under this section:
(1) may not be charged a penalty, fee, loss of deposit, or any other
additional cost because of the termination, suspension, or reinstatement; and
(2) is not liable for payment for any services after the effective date of the
termination or suspension, until the effective date of any reinstatement of services.
13–902.
(a) This section does not apply to a member of the [United States Army, Navy,
Air Force, Marines, Space Force, or Coast Guard] UNIFORMED SERVICES, the organized
militia of this State or another state, an officer of the Maryland Defense Force, or a member
of associations wholly composed of [soldiers] SERVICE MEMBERS, AS DEFINED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, honorably discharged from the [armed
forces of the United States] UNIFORMED SERVICES.
13–904.
(a) A person who is the owner or who is an agent of the owner of a place of
amusement or recreation open to the public may not refuse admission to an officer or
enlisted individual of the [United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Space
Force, or Air Force] UNIFORMED SERVICES or the organized militia of this State or of
another state because the officer or enlisted individual is in uniform.
13A–101.
(a) In this title, unless the context otherwise requires, the following words have
the meanings indicated.
(k) “Judge advocate” means a commissioned officer of the organized state military
forces who is a member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state:
(1) (i) certified or designated as a judge advocate in the Judge Advocate
General’s Corps of the [Army, Air Force, Navy, Space Force, or the Marine Corps] ARMED
FORCES or designated as a law specialist as an officer of the Coast Guard, or a reserve
component of one of these; or
13A–506.
(c) In the instance when a defense counsel is not a member of the bar of the
highest court of the state, the defense counsel shall be deemed admitted pro hac vice,
subject to filing a certificate with the military judge setting forth the qualifications that
counsel is:
– 21 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) (i) a commissioned officer of the armed forces [of the United States]
or a component thereof;
13A–1009.
(a) A member of the State military forces is guilty of desertion if the member:
(3) without being regularly separated from one of the State military forces:
(i) enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of
the State military forces, or in one of the [armed forces of the United States] UNIFORMED
SERVICES, without fully disclosing the fact that the member has not been regularly
separated; or
13A–1041.
(b) The substances referred to in subsection (a) of this section are:
(2) any substance not specified in item (1) of this subsection that is listed
on a schedule of controlled substances prescribed by the President for the purposes of the
Uniform Code of Military Justice of the armed forces [of the United States], 10 U.S.C. §
801 et seq.; and
13A–1102.
(b) The following persons may administer oaths necessary in the performance of
their duties:
(6) all other persons designated by regulations of the armed forces [of the
United States] or by statute.
14–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (2) “Emergency management” does not include the preparation for and
carrying out of functions in an emergency for which [military forces] THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES are primarily responsible.
Article – Real Property
8–212.1.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
(a) (1) In this section[, “change] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS “SERVICE MEMBER” AS
DEFINED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “CHANGE of assignment” includes:
[(1)] (I) Permanent change of station orders;
[(2)] (II) Temporary duty orders for a period exceeding 90 days;
[(3)] (III) Orders requiring a person to move into quarters located on a
military installation; and
[(4)] (IV) A release from active duty, including:
[(i)] 1. Retirement;
[(ii)] 2. Separation or discharge under honorable conditions; and
[(iii)] 3. Demobilization of an activated [reservist or a member of
the National Guard] MEMBER OF A RESERVE COMPONENT who was serving on active
duty orders for at least 180 consecutive days.
(5) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, if [a person who is on active
duty with the United States military, or the person’s] AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR
THE ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER’S spouse[,] enters into a residential lease of property and
the [person] ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER subsequently receives a change of assignment,
before or after occupying the property, any liability of the [person, or the person’s] ACTIVE
SERVICE MEMBER OR THE ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER’S spouse, for rent under the lease
may not exceed:
(1) Any rent or lawful charges then due and payable plus 30 days’ rent after
written notice and proof of the change of assignment is given to the landlord; and
(2) The cost of repairing damage to the premises caused by an act or
omission of the tenant.
– 23 –

Ch. 262 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
(C) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) SERVING IN A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES ON ACTIVE DUTY ORDERS.
(D) “ARMED FORCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 10 U.S.C. § 101.
[(b)] (E) “Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Maryland Veterans Trust.
[(c)] (F) “Department” means the Department of Veterans and Military
Families.
(G) “MILITARY FAMILY” INCLUDES THE SPOUSE AND DEPENDENT
CHILDREN OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR VETERAN RELATED BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION.
(H) “RESERVE COMPONENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(d)] (I) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families.
(J) “SERVICE MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF:
(1) THE UNIFORMED SERVICES; OR
(2) A RESERVE COMPONENT OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES.
[(e)] (K) “Trust” means the Maryland Veterans Trust.
(L) “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 37 U.S.C. § 101.
[(f)] (M) Except as otherwise provided [in this subtitle], “veteran” [means an
individual who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than
for training, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable] HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 262
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 25 –